Georgia, session 2025_26, SB79.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
S. B. 79
- 1 -

25 LC 57 0211
14 PART I
15 SECTION 1-1.
16 This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Fentanyl Eradication and Removal Act."
17 SECTION 1-2.
18 Title 16 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to crimes and offenses, is
19 amended in Code Section 16-13-30, relating to purchase, possession, manufacture,
20 distribution, or sale of controlled substances or marijuana, and penalties, by adding a new
21 subsection to read as follows:
22 "(c.1) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (c) of this Code section, any person
23 who violates subsection (a) of this Code section with respect to fentanyl as identified in
24 subparagraph (F) of paragraph (2) of Code Section 16-13-26, the fentanyl analog structural
25 class as identified in paragraph (13) of Code Section 16-13-25, or any mixture containing
26 any such substance in violation of this article shall be guilty of a felony and, upon a first
27 or second conviction thereof, shall be punished as follows:
28 (1) If the aggregate weight, including any mixture, is less than 250 milligrams of a solid
29 substance, less than 0.25 milliliter of a liquid substance, or if the substance is placed onto
30 a secondary medium with a combined weight of less than 250 milligrams, by
31 imprisonment for not less than one year nor more than five years; and
32 (2) If the aggregate weight, including any mixture, is at least 250 milligrams but less than
33 four grams of a solid substance, at least 0.25 milliliter but less than four milliliters of a
34 liquid substance, or if the substance is placed onto a secondary medium with a combined
35 weight of at least 250 milligrams but less than four grams, by imprisonment for not less
36 than one year nor more than ten years."
S. B. 79
- 2 -

25 LC 57 0211
37 SECTION 1-3.
38 Said title is further amended in Code Section 16-13-31, relating to trafficking in cocaine,
39 illegal drugs, marijuana, or methamphetamine and penalties, by revising subsections (b), (g),
40 and (i) and by adding a new subsection to read as follows:
41 "(b) Except as authorized by this article, any person who sells, manufactures, delivers,
42 brings into this state, or has possession of four grams or more of any morphine, opium, or
43 substance identified in subparagraph (RR) or (SS) of paragraph (1) or paragraph (13), (14),
44 or (15) of Code Section 16-13-25, or subparagraph (A), (C.5), (F), (U.1), (V), or (V.2) of
45 paragraph (2) of Code Section 16-13-26 or any salt, isomer, or salt of an isomer thereof,
46 including heroin, as described in Schedules I and II, or four grams or more of any mixture
47 containing any such substance in violation of this article commits the felony offense of
48 trafficking in illegal drugs and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished as follows:
49 (1) If the quantity of such substances involved is four grams or more, but less than 14
50 grams, the person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of imprisonment of
51 five years and shall pay a fine of $50,000.00;
52 (2) If the quantity of such substances involved is 14 grams or more, but less than 28
53 grams, the person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of imprisonment of
54 ten years and shall pay a fine of $100,000.00; and
55 (3) If the quantity of such substances involved is 28 grams or more, the person shall be
56 sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of imprisonment of 25 years and shall pay a fine
57 of $500,000.00.
58 (b.1) Except as authorized by this article, any person who sells, manufactures, delivers,
59 brings into this state, or has possession of fentanyl as identified in subparagraph (F) of
60 paragraph (2) of Code Section 16-13-26, the fentanyl analog structural class as identified
61 in paragraph (13) of Code Section 16-13-25, or any mixture containing any such substance
62 in violation of this article commits the felony offense of trafficking in fentanyl and, upon
63 conviction thereof, shall be punished as follows:
S. B. 79
- 3 -

25 LC 57 0211
64 (1) If the quantity of such substances involved is four grams or more, but less than eight
65 grams, the person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of imprisonment of
66 ten years and shall pay a fine of $75,000.00;
67 (2) If the quantity of such substances involved is eight grams or more, but less
68 than 14 grams, the person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of
69 imprisonment of 15 years and shall pay a fine of $150,000.00;
70 (3) If the quantity of such substances involved is 14 grams or more, but less than 28
71 grams, the person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of imprisonment
72 of 25 years and shall pay a fine of $250,000.00; and
73 (4) If the quantity of such substances involved is 28 grams or more, the person shall be
74 sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of imprisonment of 35 years and shall pay a fine
75 of $750,000.00."
76 "(g)(1) The district attorney may move the sentencing court to impose a reduced or
77 suspended sentence upon any person who is convicted of a violation of this Code section
78 who provides substantial assistance in the identification, arrest, or conviction of any of
79 his or her accomplices, accessories, coconspirators, or principals. Upon good cause
80 shown, the motion may be filed and heard in camera. The judge hearing the motion Upon
81 hearing such motion, the sentencing court may impose a reduced or suspended sentence
82 if he or she such court finds that the defendant has rendered such substantial assistance.
83 (2)(A) In the court's discretion, the judge may The sentencing court may, in its
84 discretion, depart from the mandatory minimum sentence specified for a person who
85 is convicted of a violation of this Code section as set forth in subparagraph (B) of this
86 paragraph if the judge such court concludes that:
87 (i) The defendant was not a leader of the criminal conduct;
88 (ii) The defendant did not possess or use a firearm, dangerous weapon, or hazardous
89 object during the crime;
S. B. 79
- 4 -

25 LC 57 0211
90 (iii) The criminal conduct did not result in a death or serious bodily injury to a person
91 other than to a person who is a party to the crime;
92 (iv) The defendant has no prior felony conviction; and
93 (v) The interests of justice will not be served by the imposition of the prescribed
94 mandatory minimum sentence.
95 (B) The sentencing departure ranges pursuant to subparagraph (A) of this paragraph
96 shall be as follows:
97 (i) Any person convicted of violating paragraph (1) of subsection (b) or (d) of this
98 Code section, two years and six months to five years imprisonment and a fine of not
99 less than $25,000.00 nor more than $50,000.00;
100 (ii) Any person convicted of violating paragraph (1) of subsection (c) of this Code
101 section, two years and six months to five years imprisonment and a fine of not less
102 than $50,000.00 nor more than $100,000.00;
103 (iii) Any person convicted of violating paragraph (2) of subsection (c) of this Code
104 section, three years and six months to seven years imprisonment and a fine of not less
105 than $125,000.00 nor more than $250,000.00;
106 (iv) Any person convicted of violating subparagraph (a)(1)(A), paragraph (2) of
107 subsection (a), relating to the quantity of drugs specified in subparagraph (a)(1)(A)
108 of this Code section, or paragraph (1) of subsection (e) or (f) of this Code section, five
109 to ten years imprisonment and a fine of not less than $100,000.00 nor more than
110 $200,000.00;
111 (v) Any person convicted of violating paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of this Code
112 section, five to ten years imprisonment and a fine of not less than $50,000.00 nor
113 more than $100,000.00;
114 (vi) Any person convicted of violating subparagraph (a)(1)(B), paragraph (2) of
115 subsection (a), relating to the quantity of drugs specified in subparagraph (a)(1)(B)
116 of this Code section, or paragraph (2) of subsection (e) or (f) of this Code section,
S. B. 79
- 5 -

25 LC 57 0211
117 seven years and six months to 15 years imprisonment and a fine of not less than
118 $150,000.00 nor more than $300,000.00;
119 (vii) Any person convicted of violating paragraph (3) of subsection (c) of this Code
120 section, seven years and six months to 15 years imprisonment and a fine of not less
121 than $500,000.00 nor more than $1 million;
122 (viii) Any person convicted of violating paragraph (2) of subsection (d) of this Code
123 section, seven years and six months to 15 years imprisonment and a fine of not less
124 than $125,000.00 nor more than $250,000.00;
125 (ix) Any person convicted of violating paragraph (3) of subsection (b) of this Code
126 section, 12 years and six months to 25 years imprisonment and a fine of not less than
127 $250,000.00 nor more than $500,000.00; and
128 (x) Any person convicted of violating subparagraph (a)(1)(C), paragraph (2) of
129 subsection (a), relating to the quantity of drugs specified in subparagraph (a)(1)(C)
130 of this Code section, or paragraph (3) of subsection (e) or (f) of this Code section, 12
131 years and six months to 25 years imprisonment and a fine of not less than
132 $500,000.00 nor more than $1 million.
133 (i) Any person convicted of violating subparagraph (a)(1)(A), paragraph (2) of
134 subsection (a) relating to the quantity of drugs specified in subparagraph (a)(1)(A) of
135 this Code section, or paragraph (1) of subsection (e) or (f) of this Code section,
136 imprisonment for not less than five nor more than ten years and a fine of not less
137 than $100,000.00 nor more than $200,000.00;
138 (ii) Any person convicted of violating subparagraph (a)(1)(B), paragraph (2) of
139 subsection (a) relating to the quantity of drugs specified in subparagraph (a)(1)(B) of
140 this Code section, or paragraph (2) of subsection (e) or (f) of this Code section,
141 imprisonment for not less than seven years and six months nor more than 15 years and
142 a fine of not less than $150,000.00 nor more than $300,000.00;
S. B. 79
- 6 -

25 LC 57 0211
143 (iii) Any person convicted of violating subparagraph (a)(1)(C), paragraph (2) of
144 subsection (a) relating to the quantity of drugs specified in subparagraph (a)(1)(C) of
145 this Code section, or paragraph (3) of subsection (e) or (f) of this Code section,
146 imprisonment for not less than 12 years and six months nor more than 25 years and
147 a fine of not less than $500,000.00 nor more than $1 million;
148 (iv) Any person convicted of violating paragraph (1) of subsection (b) or (d) of this
149 Code section, imprisonment for not less than two years and six months nor more than
150 five years and a fine of not less than $25,000.00 nor more than $50,000.00;
151 (v) Any person convicted of violating paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of this Code
152 section, imprisonment for not less than five years nor more than ten years and a fine
153 of not less than $50,000.00 nor more than $100,000.00;
154 (vi) Any person convicted of violating paragraph (3) of subsection (b) of this Code
155 section, imprisonment for not less than 12 years and six months nor more than 25
156 years and a fine of not less than $250,000.00 nor more than $500,000.00;
157 (vii) Any person convicted of violating paragraph (1) of subsection (b.1) of this Code
158 section, imprisonment for not less than two years and six months nor more than five
159 years and a fine of not less than $12,500.00 nor more than $25,000.00;
160 (viii) Any person convicted of violating paragraph (2) of subsection (b.1) of this
161 Code section, imprisonment for not less than five years nor more than ten years and
162 a fine of not less than $25,000.00 nor more than $50,000.00;
163 (ix) Any person convicted of violating paragraph (3) of subsection (b.1) of this Code
164 section, imprisonment for not less than ten years nor more than 20 years and a fine of
165 not less than $50,000.00 nor more than $100,000.00;
166 (x) Any person convicted of violating paragraph (4) of subsection (b.1) of this Code
167 section, imprisonment for not less than 15 years nor more than 30 years and a fine of
168 not less than $250,000.00 nor more than $500,000.00;
S. B. 79
- 7 -

25 LC 57 0211
169 (xi) Any person convicted of violating paragraph (1) of subsection (c) of this Code
170 section, imprisonment for not less than two years and six months nor more than five
171 years and a fine of not less than $50,000.00 nor more than $100,000.00;
172 (xii) Any person convicted of violating paragraph (2) of subsection (c) of this Code
173 section, imprisonment for not less than three years and six months nor more than
174 seven years and a fine of not less than $125,000.00 nor more than $250,000.00;
175 (xiii) Any person convicted of violating paragraph (3) of subsection (c) of this Code
176 section, imprisonment for not less than seven years and six months nor more than 15
177 years and a fine of not less than $500,000.00 nor more than $1 million; and
178 (xiv) Any person convicted of violating paragraph (2) of subsection (d) of this Code
179 section, imprisonment for not less than seven years and six months nor more than 15
180 years and a fine of not less than $125,000.00 nor more than $250,000.00.
181 (C) If a judge reduces the sentencing court departs from the mandatory minimum
182 sentence pursuant to this paragraph, the judge such court shall specify on the record the
183 circumstances for the reduction such departure and the interests served by such
184 departure. Any such order shall be appealable by the State of Georgia pursuant to Code
185 Section 5-7-1.
186 (D) As used in this paragraph, the term:
187 (i) 'Dangerous weapon' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code
188 Section 16-11-121.
189 (ii) 'Firearm' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 16-11-127.1
190 16-11-131.
191 (iii) 'Hazardous object' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code
192 Section 20-2-751.
193 (iv) 'Leader' means a person who planned and organized others and acted as a guiding
194 force in order to achieve a common goal.
S. B. 79
- 8 -

25 LC 57 0211
195 (3) In the court's discretion, the judge may The sentencing court may, in its discretion,
196 depart from the mandatory minimum sentence specified in this Code section for a person
197 who is convicted of a violation of this Code section when the prosecuting attorney and
198 the defendant have agreed to a sentence that is below such mandatory minimum."
199 "(i) Notwithstanding Code Section 16-13-2, any Except as provided in subsection (g) of
200 this Code section and notwithstanding the provisions of Code Section 16-13-2 to the
201 contrary, with respect to any person who is found to have violated this Code section, no
202 portion of the mandatory minimum sentence shall be suspended, stayed, probated, deferred,
203 or otherwise withheld by the sentencing court. Any sentence imposed pursuant to
204 subsection (g) of this Code section shall not be reduced by any earned time, early release,
205 work release, leave, or other sentence-reducing measures under programs administered by
206 the Department of Corrections, the effect of which would be to reduce the period of
207 incarceration ordered by the sentencing court or any form of pardon, parole, or
208 commutation of sentence by the State Board of Pardons and Paroles; provided, however,
209 that during the final year of incarceration, a defendant so sentenced shall be eligible to be
210 considered for participation in a Department of Corrections administered transitional center
211 or work release program."
212 PART II
213 SECTION 2-1.
214 Code Section 4-8-27 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to certificates of
215 registration for dog ownership, requirements for issuance of certificate, individuals excluded
216 from receiving registration, limitation of ownership, and annual renewal, is amended by
217 revising paragraph (3) of subsection (f) as follows:
S. B. 79
- 9 -

25 LC 57 0211
218 "(3) A felony involving trafficking in cocaine, illegal drugs, marijuana,
219 methamphetamine, or ecstasy as provided for in of substances in violation of Code
220 Sections 16-13-31 and 16-13-31.1."
221 SECTION 2-2.
222 Title 16 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to crimes and offenses, is
223 amended in Code Section 16-11-106, relating to possession of firearm or knife during
224 commission of or attempt to commit certain crimes, by revising paragraph (5) of
225 subsection (b) as follows:
226 "(5) Any crime involving the trafficking of cocaine, marijuana, or illegal drugs as
227 provided in substances in violation of Code Section 16-13-31,"
228 SECTION 2-3.
229 Said title is further amended in Code Section 16-11-133, relating to minimum periods of
230 confinement for persons convicted who have prior convictions, by revising paragraph (5) of
231 subsection (b) as follows:
232 "(5) Any crime involving the trafficking of cocaine, marijuana, or illegal drugs as
233 provided in substances in violation of Code Section 16-13-31,"
234 SECTION 2-4.
235 Said title is further amended in Code Section 16-11-160, relating to use of machine guns,
236 sawed-off rifles, sawed-off shotguns, or firearms with silencers during commission of certain
237 offenses and enhanced criminal penalties, by revising division (a)(2)(B)(iii) as follows:
238 "(iii) Trafficking in cocaine, illegal drugs, marijuana, or methamphetamine as
239 provided in of substances in violation of Code Section 16-13-31."
S. B. 79
- 10 -

25 LC 57 0211
240 SECTION 2-5.
241 Title 17 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to criminal procedure, is
242 amended in Code Section 17-6-1, relating to when offenses bailable, procedure, schedule of
243 bails, and appeal bonds, by revising subsection (g) as follows:
244 "(g) No appeal bond shall be granted to any person who has been convicted of murder,
245 rape, aggravated sodomy, armed robbery, home invasion in any degree, aggravated child
246 molestation, child molestation, kidnapping, trafficking in cocaine or marijuana of
247 substances in violation of Code Section 16-13-31, aggravated stalking, or aircraft hijacking
248 and who has been sentenced to serve a period of incarceration of five years or more. The
249 granting of an appeal bond to a person who has been convicted of any other felony offense
250 or of any misdemeanor offense involving an act of family violence as defined in Code
251 Section 19-13-1, or of any offense delineated as a high and aggravated misdemeanor or of
252 any offense set forth in Code Section 40-6-391, shall be in the discretion of the convicting
253 court. Appeal bonds shall terminate when the right of appeal terminates, and such bonds
254 shall not be effective as to any petition for review or petition or application for writ of
255 certiorari unless the court in which the petition for review or petition or application is filed
256 so specifies."
257 SECTION 2-6.
258 Said title is further amended in Code Section 17-6-12, relating to unsecured judicial release,
259 requirement, effect of failure of person charged to appear for trial, and consideration of
260 criminal record, by revising subparagraph (a)(1)(U) as follows:
261 "(U) Trafficking in cocaine, illegal drugs, marijuana, or methamphetamine of
262 substances in violation of Code Section 16-13-31;"
S. B. 79
- 11 -

25 LC 57 0211
263 SECTION 2-7.
264 Said title is further amended in Code Section 17-10-9.1, relating to voluntary surrender to
265 county jail or correctional institution and release of defendant, by revising paragraph (9) of
266 subsection (a) as follows:
267 "(9) Trafficking of substances in violation of Violating Code Section 16-13-31, relating
268 to trafficking in cocaine or marijuana;"
269 SECTION 2-8.
270 Article 2 of Chapter 9 of Title 42 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
271 grants of pardons, paroles, and other relief, is amended in Code Section 42-9-42, relating to
272 procedure for granting relief from sentence, conditions and prerequisites, public access to
273 information, and violation of parole, by revising division (b)(1)(B)(xxix) as follows:
274 "(xxix) Trafficking in cocaine, illegal drugs, marijuana, or methamphetamine of
275 substances in violation of Code Section 16-13-31;"
276 SECTION 2-9.
277 Said article is further amended in Code Section 42-9-45, relating to general rule-making
278 power, by revising subsection (f) as follows:
279 "(f) Except to correct a patent miscarriage of justice and not otherwise, no inmate serving
280 a sentence imposed for any of the crimes listed in this subsection shall be granted release
281 on parole until and unless said inmate has served on good behavior seven years of
282 imprisonment or one-third of the prison term imposed by the sentencing court for the
283 violent crime, whichsoever first occurs. No inmate serving a sentence for any crime listed
284 in this subsection shall be released on parole for the purpose of regulating jail or prison
285 populations. This subsection shall govern parole actions in sentences imposed for any of
286 the following crimes: voluntary manslaughter, statutory rape, incest, cruelty to children,
287 arson in the first degree, homicide by vehicle while under the influence of alcohol or as a
S. B. 79
- 12 -

25 LC 57 0211
288 habitual traffic violator, aggravated battery, aggravated assault, trafficking in drugs of
289 substances in violation of Code Section 16-13-31 or 16-13-31.1, and violations of
290 Chapter 14 of Title 16, the 'Georgia RICO (Racketeer Influenced and Corrupt
291 Organizations) Act.'"
292 SECTION 2-10.
293 Said article is further amended in Code Section 42-9-60, relating to overcrowding of prison
294 system as creating state of emergency, paroling inmates to reduce prison system population
295 to capacity, and annual report of inmates paroled, by revising paragraph (2) of subsection (a)
296 as follows:
297 "(2) 'Dangerous offender' means a state prison inmate who is imprisoned for conviction
298 of any one or more of the following crimes as defined by Title 16, the 'Criminal Code of
299 Georgia': murder, voluntary manslaughter, kidnapping, armed robbery, rape, aircraft
300 hijacking, aggravated sodomy, aggravated battery, aggravated assault, incest, child
301 molestation, child abuse, or enticing a child for indecent purposes, or any felony
302 punishable under Code Section 16-13-31, relating to prohibited acts regarding marijuana,
303 cocaine, and illegal drugs. The term 'dangerous offender' violation of trafficking of
304 substances in violation of Code Section 16-13-31. Such term shall also include an inmate
305 who is incarcerated for a second or subsequent time for the commission of a crime for
306 which the inmate could have been sentenced to life imprisonment."
307 SECTION 2-11.
308 Code Section 45-12-37 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to reward for
309 information leading to arrest and conviction of person selling dangerous or narcotic drugs
310 generally and rewards by counties and municipalities, is amended by revising subsection (b)
311 as follows:
S. B. 79
- 13 -

25 LC 57 0211
312 "(b) Any person, other than a law enforcement officer, who furnishes information leading
313 to the arrest and conviction of a person who is charged with selling dangerous drugs in
314 violation of Code Section 16-13-72 may receive a reward of up to $500.00. Any person,
315 other than a law enforcement officer, who furnishes information leading to the arrest and
316 conviction of a person who is charged with selling a controlled substance in violation of
317 Code Section 16-13-30 or trafficking of substances in violation of Code Section 16-13-31,
318 may receive a reward of $1,000.00."
319 PART III
320 SECTION 3-1.
321 This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2025, and shall apply to all offenses committed
322 on or after such date.
323 SECTION 3-2.
324 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 79
- 14 -